test/src/morphology/N-paall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pââll â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     pââll+N+Sg+Nom: pââll
     pââll+N+Sg+Gen: pââl
     pââll+N+Sg+Acc: pââl
     pââll+N+Sg+Ill: põllu
     pââll+N+Sg+Loc: pââlast
     pââll+N+Sg+Com: pââlain
     pââll+N+Ess: pââllan
     pââll+N+Par: pââllad
     pââll+N+Sg+Abe: pââltää
     pââll+N+Pl+Nom: pââl
     pââll+N+Pl+Gen: pââlai
     pââll+N+Pl+Acc: pââlaid
     pââll+N+Pl+Ill: pââlaid
     pââll+N+Pl+Loc: pââlain
     pââll+N+Pl+Com: pââlaivui′m
     pââll+N+Pl+Abe: pââlaitää
